Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325M.335] MENTAL HEALTH WARNING LABEL; POP-UP TIMER REQUIRED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Warning label required. new text end new text begin (a) A social media platform must ensure that a conspicuous mental health warning label that complies with the requirements under this section: new text end new text begin (1) appears each time a user accesses the social media platform; and new text end new text begin (2) only disappears when the user: (i) exits the social media platform; or (ii) acknowledges the potential for harm and chooses to proceed to the social media platform despite the risk. new text end new text begin (b) A mental health warning label under this section must: new text end new text begin (1) in a manner that conforms with the guidelines established under subdivision 2, warn the user of potential negative mental health impacts of accessing the social media platform; and new text end new text begin (2) provide the user access to resources to address the potential negative mental health impacts described in clause (1) and include the website and telephone number of a national suicide prevention and mental health crisis hotline system, including but not limited to the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline. new text end new text begin (c) A social media platform is prohibited from: new text end new text begin (1) providing the warning label exclusively in the social media platform's terms and conditions; new text end new text begin (2) including extraneous information in the warning label that obscures the visibility or prominence of the warning label; or new text end new text begin (3) allowing a user to disable a warning label, except as provided under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Content of label. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of health, in consultation with the commissioner of commerce, must develop guidelines for social media platforms that contain appropriate requirements for the warning labels required under this section. The guidelines must be based on current evidence regarding the negative mental health impacts of social media platforms. The commissioners must review and revise the guidelines as appropriate. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of health is exempt from chapter 14, including section 14.386, when implementing this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Pop-up timer required. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided under paragraph (b), a social media platform must display a conspicuous pop-up notification at least once every 30 minutes that a user has actively used the platform. The notification must: new text end new text begin (1) inform the user that the user has actively used the platform for the relevant consecutive period of time; new text end new text begin (2) inform the user of the total time the user has actively used the platform that day; and new text end new text begin (3) only disappear when the user acknowledges the notification. new text end new text begin (b) A social media platform may allow a user to: new text end new text begin (1) deactivate the notification required under paragraph (a); or new text end new text begin (2) customize the period of time resulting in the notification, provided that the maximum time period does not exceed 60 minutes. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 325M.34, is amended to read: 325M.34 ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITY. (a) The attorney general may investigate and bring an action against a social media platform for an alleged violation of section 325M.33new text begin or 325M.335new text end . (b) Nothing in sections 325M.30 to 325M.34 creates a private cause of action in favor of a person injured by a violation of section 325M.33. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end